Georgia, session 2025_26, HB614.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 25-10-2 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to prohibited
fireworks activities and application of noise ordinances, is amended by adding a new
subsection to read as follows:
"(d)(1) As used in this subsection, the term 'equine' shall have the same meaning as set
forth in Code Section 2-8-121.
(2) The governing authority of a county or municipal corporation may adopt an
ordinance prohibiting the use or ignition of consumer fireworks up to 200 yards from a
facility housing equines in a confined area.
- 1 -

LC 44 3156S
(3) An ordinance adopted by the governing authority of a county or municipal
corporation pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection may include provisions
authorizing the issuance by such governing authority of special event permits to allow the
temporary use or ignition of consumer fireworks up to 200 yards from a facility housing
equines in a confined area."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
- 2 -